District of Columbia statutes.
48-833.03

Content of annual report by manufacturer or labeler.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the annual report filed pursuant to § 48-833.02 shall include the following information as it pertains to marketing activities conducted within the District in a form that provides the value, nature, purpose, and recipient of the expense:

(1)

All expenses associated with advertising, marketing, and direct promotion of prescription drugs through radio, television, magazines, newspapers, direct mail, and telephone communications as they pertain to District residents;

(2)

With regard to all persons and entities licensed to provide health care in the District, including health care professionals and persons employed by them in the District, carriers licensed under Title 31, health plans and benefits managers, pharmacies, hospitals, nursing facilities, clinics, and other entities licensed to provide health care in the District, the following information:

(A)

All expenses associated with educational or informational programs, materials, and seminars, and remuneration for promoting or participating in educational or informational sessions, regardless of whether the manufacturer or labeler provides the educational or informational sessions or materials;

(B)

All expenses associated with food, entertainment, gifts valued at more than $25, and anything provided to a health care professional for less than market value;

(C)

All expenses associated with trips and travel; and

(D)

All expenses associated with product samples, except for samples that will be distributed free of charge to patients; and

(3)

The aggregate cost of all employees or contractors of the manufacturer or labeler who directly or indirectly engage in the advertising or promotional activities listed in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, including all forms of payment to those employees. The cost reported under this paragraph shall reflect only that portion of payment to employees or contractors that pertains to activities within the District or to recipients of the advertising or promotional activities who are residents of or are employed in the District.

(b)

The following marketing expenses are not subject to the requirements of this subchapter:

(1)

Expenses of $25 or less;

(2)

Reasonable compensation and reimbursement for expenses in connection with a bona fide clinical trial of a new vaccine, therapy, or treatment; and

(3)

Scholarships and reimbursement of expenses for attending a significant educational, scientific, or policy-making conference or seminar of a national, regional, or specialty medical or other professional association if the recipient of the scholarship is chosen by the association sponsoring the conference or seminar.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 303, 51 DCR 3688
This section is referenced in § 48-831.02.